Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Task Force  on Homelessness and Racial Disparities shall provide a
report, to an appropriate committee or interim committee of the  Legislative Assembly in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245, specifically identifying  implementation pathways for
changes to the  state’s funding structure, modifications for contracting processes and sol-
utions regarding the eligibility and funding  of services under section 7 (3)(b), (d) and (e),
chapter 448, Oregon Laws 2021.
(2) The task force shall deliver an interim report by September 15, 2022, and a final report
by March 31, 2023.
(3) The task force shall deliver a  copy of the interim report and final report to the
Oregon Housing Stability Council.
(4) This section  and section 7, chapter 448, Oregon Laws 2021, do not prohibit the task
force from developing additional reports or delivering those reports  to the Legislative As-
sembly or council.
SECTION 2.  Section 8, chapter 448, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  Section 7 , chapter 448, Oregon Laws 2021, and section 1 of this 2022 Act are  [of this
2021 Act is ] repealed on [ July 1, 2022 ] January 2, 2026 .
SECTION 2a. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Housing and Community Services Department by section 1, chapter  556,
Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, is increased by $362,977 for pro-
fessional services costs of the Task Force on Homelessness and Racial Disparities.
SECTION 3.  Section 4, chapter 18, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) Section 3 , chapter 18, Oregon Laws 2021,  [ of this 2021 Act ] is repealed on July 1,
[2022] 2023.
(2) The repeal of section 3 , chapter 18, Oregon Laws 2021,  [ of this 2021 Act ] by subsection (1)
of this section does not affect an application for the development of  land for an emergency shelter
that was completed and submitted before the date of the repeal.
SECTION 4.  ORS 197.308 is amended to read:
197.308. (1) As used in this section, “affordable housing” means residential property:
(a) In which:
Enrolled House Bill 4051 (HB 4051-B) Page 1
(A) Each unit  on the property is made available to own or rent to families with incomes of 80
percent or less  of the area median income as determined by the Oregon Housing Stability Council
based on information from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development; or
(B) The average  of all units on the property is made available to families with incomes of 60
percent or less of the area median income; and
(b) Whose affordability is enforceable, including as described in ORS 456.270 to  456.295, for a
duration of no less than 30 years.
(2) A local government shall  allow affordable housing, and may not require a zone change or
conditional use permit for affordable  housing , if the proposed affordable housing is  on property
[if] that is :
(a) [ The housing is ] Owned by:
(A) A public body, as defined in ORS 174.109; or
(B) A nonprofit corporation that is organized as a religious corporation; or
(b) [ The property is ] Zoned:
(A) For commercial uses;
(B) To allow religious assembly; or
(C) As public lands.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Does not apply to the development of housing not within an urban growth boundary.
(b) Does not trigger any requirement that a local  government consider or update an analysis
as required by a statewide planning goal relating to economic development.
(c) Applies on property zoned to allow for industrial uses only if the property is:
(A) Publicly owned;
(B) Adjacent to lands zoned for residential uses or schools; and
(C) Not specifically designated for heavy industrial uses.
(d) Does not apply on lands where the local government determines that:
(A) The development  on the property cannot be adequately served by water, sewer, storm water
drainage or streets, or will not be adequately served at the time  that development on the lot is
complete;
(B) The property contains a slope of 25 percent or greater;
(C) The property is within a 100-year floodplain; or
(D) The development of the property is  constrained by land use regulations based on statewide
land use planning goals relating to:
(i) Natural disasters and hazards; or
(ii) Natural resources,  including air, water, land or natural areas, but not including open spaces
or historic resources.
(4) A local government  shall approve an application at an authorized density level and author-
ized height level, as defined  in ORS 227.175 (4), for the development of affordable housing, at the
greater of:
(a) Any local density bonus for affordable housing; or
(b) Without consideration of any local density bonus for affordable housing:
(A) For property with  existing maximum density of 16 or fewer units per acre, 200 percent of
the existing density and 12 additional feet;
(B) For property with existing maximum density  of 17 or more units per acre and 45 or fewer
units per acre, 150 percent of the existing density and 24 additional feet; or
(C) For property with existing maximum density of 46 or more units per acre, 125  percent of the
existing density and 36 additional feet.
(5)(a) Subsection  (4) of this section does not apply to housing allowed under subsection (2) of this
section in areas that are not zoned for residential uses.
(b) A local government may reduce  the density or height of the density bonus allowed under
subsection (4) of  this section as necessary to address a health, safety or habitability issue, including
fire safety, or to comply with a protective measure adopted pursuant to a  statewide land use plan-
Enrolled House Bill 4051 (HB 4051-B) Page 2
ning goal. Notwithstanding ORS  197.350, the local government must adopt findings supported by
substantial evidence demonstrating the necessity of this reduction.
SECTION 5. This 2022 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2022
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House February 28, 2022
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 2, 2022
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4051 (HB 4051-B) Page 3